California statutes. Public Resources Code
(2) As used in this subdivision:

(A) “Disaster” means any situation in which the force or forces which destroyed the structure to be replaced were beyond the control of its owner.

(B) “Bulk” means total interior cubic volume as measured from the exterior surface of the structure.

(C) “Structure” includes landscaping and any erosion control structure or device which is similar to that which existed prior to the occurrence of the disaster.

(h) Any activity anywhere in the coastal zone that involves the conversion of any existing multiple-unit residential structure to a time-share project, estate, or use, as defined in Section 11212 of the Business and Professions Code. If any improvement to an existing structure is otherwise exempt from the permit requirements of this division, no coastal development permit shall be required for that improvement on the basis that it is to be made in connection with any conversion exempt pursuant to this subdivision. The division of a multiple-unit residential structure into condominiums, as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, shall not be considered a time-share project, estate, or use for purposes of this subdivision.

(i) (1) Any proposed development which the executive director finds to be a temporary event which does not have any significant adverse impact upon coastal resources within the meaning of guidelines adopted pursuant to this subdivision by the commission. The commission shall, after public hearing, adopt guidelines to implement this subdivision to assist local governments and persons planning temporary events in complying with this division by specifying the standards which the executive director shall use in determining whether a temporary event is excluded from permit requirements pursuant to this subdivision. The guidelines adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the review of the Office of Administrative Law and from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Exclusion or waiver from the coastal development permit requirements of this division pursuant to this subdivision does not diminish, waive, or otherwise prevent the commission from asserting and exercising its coastal development permit jurisdiction over any temporary event at any time if the commission determines that the exercise of its jurisdiction is necessary to implement the coastal resource protection policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.05.

(a) (1) By July 1, 2027, the commission shall, pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 30610, and in consultation with the Department of Housing and Community Development, identify infill areas within at least three local jurisdictions that currently do not have a certified local coastal program, wherein development of a residential housing project comprised entirely of units, excluding managers’ units, that are deed-restricted for persons of very low-, low-, or moderate-income shall be categorically excluded from the requirement to obtain a coastal development permit.

(2) The categorical exclusion described in this
 subdivision shall remain in effect until June 30, 2037. The categorical exclusion described in paragraph (1) shall be of no further force or effect within an identified jurisdiction if the certification of the applicable local coastal program occurs on or before June 30, 2037.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13244 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, each of the areas identified by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be effective upon the commission certifying the exclusion pursuant to the two-thirds vote of its appointed members.

(c) (1) In identifying categorical exclusion areas within
 the jurisdictions described in subdivision (a), the commission, in consultation with the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall do both of the following:

(A) Select jurisdictions located in various regions of the coast.

(B) Select
 jurisdictions that vary in population size from one another.

(2) In identifying the categorical exclusion
 infill areas
 described in subdivision (a), the commission, in consultation with the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify the largest feasible categorical exclusion areas.

(B) Ensure the areas affirmatively further fair housing, consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8899.50
 of the Government Code. 

(C) Consider each selected jurisdiction’s inventory of sites in its housing element prepared pursuant to Section 65583 of the Government Code.

(D) Avoid sites that are projected to be impacted by sea level rise and associated coastal hazards.

(d) Nothing in this section shall exempt a qualifying residential housing project proposed in a categorical exclusion area from obtaining a land use entitlement approval otherwise required by the local jurisdiction pursuant to Division 1 (commencing with Section 65000) of Title 7 of the
 Government Code.

(e) Before commencing construction of a proposed residential housing project that is categorically excluded from the permit requirements of this chapter pursuant to subdivision (a), the development proponent shall request, and the commission shall issue, a notice of exclusion documenting that the proposed project is categorically excluded from the requirement to obtain a coastal development permit.

(f) On or before August 1, 2027, the commission shall post on its internet website clearly defined maps of the categorical exclusion areas established pursuant to this section.

(g) (1) On or before January 1, 2035, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature identifying the number of projects that were constructed or that are currently under construction that were categorically excluded from the permit requirements of this chapter pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report imposed by this subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2039.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   (SB 484)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.1.

(a) Prior to certification of the applicable local coastal program, no coastal development permit shall be required for the construction of a single-family residence on any vacant lot meeting the criteria set forth in subdivision (c) and located in a specified area designated by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) Within 60 days from the effective date of this section, the commission shall designate specific areas in the coastal zone where the construction of a single-family residence on a vacant lot meeting the criteria set forth in subdivision (c) shall not require a coastal development permit. Areas shall be designated for the exclusion provided for in this section if construction of single-family residences within the area to be designated has no potential, either individually or cumulatively, for significant adverse impacts on highly scenic resources of public importance, on environmentally sensitive areas, on prime agricultural land or on agricultural lands currently in production, or on public access to or along the coast.

In addition, if septic tanks will be required or used, an area identified as having septic tank problems by the appropriate regional water quality control board or the State Water Resources Control Board in an approved basin plan or by other formal action of such board may not be designated for exclusion pursuant to this section.

(c) Within areas designated pursuant to subdivision (b), no coastal development permit shall be required for the construction of a single-family residence on any vacant lot which meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Is not located between the first public road and the sea or immediately adjacent to the inland extent of any beach or of the mean high tide line where there is no beach.

(2) Is a legal lot as of the effective date of this section and conforms with the minimum lot size and lot use designations of the applicable general plan and zoning ordinances.

(3) Is not located within an area known to the affected local government, or designated by any other public agency, as a geologic hazard area or as a flood hazard area, or, if located within such an area, it has been determined by the affected local government to be a safe site for the construction of a single-family residence.

(4) Is no more than 250 feet from an existing improved road adequate for use throughout the year.

(5) Can be served by an adequate water supply that is legally available for use either by means of a well or by means of a connection to a water system with sufficient capacity to serve such lot or lots; provided, that no such connection shall require the extension of an existing water main which would have the capacity of serving four or more additional single-family residential structures. 

(d) The commission shall, within 120 days from the effective date of this section, specify uniform criteria that shall be used to determine the location of “the first public road” and the inland extent of any beach for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(e) Within 30 days after the 120-day period specified in subdivision (b), the commission shall report to the Legislature and the Governor what has been done to carry out the provisions of this section.

(f) The provisions of this section shall apply notwithstanding any other provision of this division to the contrary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.2.

(a) Any person wishing to construct a single-family residence on a vacant lot within an area designated by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30610.1 shall, prior to the commencement of construction, secure from the local government with jurisdiction over the lot in question a written certification or determination that the lot meets the criteria specified in subdivision (c) of Section 30610.1 and is therefore exempt from the coastal development permit requirements of this division. A copy of every certification of exemption shall be sent by the issuing local government to the commission within five working days after it is issued. 

(b) If the commission does not designate the areas within the coastal zone as required by subdivision (b) of Section 30610.1 within the 60 days specified therein, a local government may make the certification authorized by subdivision (a) of this section without regard to the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 30610.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.3.

(a) Whenever the commission determines (1) that public access opportunities through an existing subdivided area, which has less than 75 percent of the subdivided lots built upon, or an area proposed to be subdivided are not adequate to meet the public access requirements of this division and (2) that individual owners of vacant lots in those areas do not have the legal authority to comply with public access requirements as a condition of securing a coastal development permit for the reason that some other person or persons has legal authority, the commission shall implement public access requirements as provided in this section.

(b) The commission, on its own motion or at the request of an affected property owner, shall identify an area as meeting the criteria specified in subdivision (a). After an area has been identified, the commission shall, after appropriate public hearings adopt a specific public access program for the area and shall request that the State Coastal Conservancy, established pursuant to Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000), implement the program. The access program shall include, but not be limited to, the identification of specific land areas and view corridors to be used for public access, any facilities or other development deemed appropriate, the commission’s recommendations regarding the manner in which public access will be managed, and the types of permitted public uses. The State Coastal Conservancy shall, pursuant to its authority, implement the public access program.

(c) The State Coastal Conservancy shall be authorized to expend funds when appropriated from the Coastal Access Account for the purchase of lands and view easements and to pay for any development needed to carry out the public access program specified in subdivision (a). Not more than 5 percent of the amount of funds necessary to carry out each public access program may be provided as a grant to the State Coastal Conservancy for its administrative costs incurred in carrying out the access program.

(d) The State Coastal Conservancy may enter into any agreement it deems necessary and appropriate with any state or local public agency or with a private association authorized to perform those functions for the operation and maintenance of any access facilities acquired or developed pursuant to this section.

(e) Every person receiving a coastal development permit or a certificate of exemption for development on any vacant lot within an area designated pursuant to this section shall, prior to the commencement of construction, pay to the commission, for deposit in the Coastal Access Account, an “in-lieu” public access fee. The amount of each fee shall be determined by dividing the cost of acquiring the specified lands and view easements by the total number of lots within the identified area. The proportion of the acquisition cost that can be allocated to lots built upon pursuant to permits that were not subject to public access conditions under this division or the California Coastal Zone Conservation Act of 1972 (former Division 18 (commencing with Section 27000)) shall be paid from the Coastal Access Account. An “in-lieu” public access fee may be in the form of an appropriate dedication, in which event the lots to which the dedication can be credited shall not be counted toward the total number of lots used in arriving at the “in-lieu” public access fee share for each remaining lot.

(f) For purposes of determining the acquisition costs specified in subdivision (e), the State Coastal Conservancy may, in the absence of a fixed price agreed to by both the State Coastal Conservancy and the seller, specify an estimated cost based on a formal appraisal of the value of the interest proposed to be acquired. The appraisal shall be conducted by an independent appraiser under contract with the State Coastal Conservancy and shall be completed within 120 days of the adoption of the specific public access program by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b). The appraisal shall be deemed suitable for all purposes of the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850 of the Government Code)). For every year following public acquisition of the interests in land specified as part of a public access program and prior to payment of the required “in-lieu” fee, a carrying cost factor equal to 5 percent of the share attributable to each lot shall be added to any unpaid “in-lieu” public access fee, provided, however, that a lot owner may pay the “in-lieu” public access fee at any time after public acquisition in order to avoid payment of the carrying cost factor.

(g) No provision of this section may be applied within any portion of the unincorporated area in the County of Sonoma, commonly known as the Sea Ranch.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 293.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.4.

(a) Upon establishment of an acquisition cost pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 30610.3, the commission shall review the area in question to determine if all or some portion of that area meets the criteria specified in subdivision (b) of Section 30610.1 for areas within which no coastal development permit will be required from the commission for construction of single-family residences. Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 30610.1, lots, other than those immediately adjacent to any beach or to the mean high tide line where there is no beach, can be included in this exclusion area. If the commission determines an area designated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30610.3 meets that criteria, the area shall be designated as one wherein no coastal development permit from the commission shall be required for the construction of single-family residences.

(b) Prior to the commencement of construction of any single-family residence within an area designated pursuant to this section, a certificate of exemption must be obtained pursuant to Section 30610.2 and the appropriate “in-lieu” public access fee shall be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 592.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.5.

Urban land areas shall, pursuant to the provisions of this section, be excluded from the permit provisions of this chapter.

(a) Upon the request of a local government, an urban land area, as specifically identified by such local government, shall, after public hearing, be excluded by the commission from the permit provisions of this chapter where both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The area to be excluded is either a residential area zoned and developed to a density of four or more dwelling units per acre on or before January 1, 1977, or a commercial or industrial area zoned and developed for such use on or before January 1, 1977.

(2) The commission finds both of the following:

(i) Locally permitted development will be infilling or replacement and will be in conformity with the scale, size, and character of the surrounding community. 

(ii) There is no potential for significant adverse effects, either individually or cumulatively, on public access to the coast or on coastal resources from any locally permitted development; provided, however, that no area may be excluded unless more than 50 percent of the lots are built upon, to the same general density or intensity of use.

(b) Every exclusion granted under subdivision (a) of this section and subdivision (e) of Section 30610 shall be subject to terms and conditions to assure that no significant change in density, height, or nature of uses will occur without further proceedings under this division, and an order granting an exclusion under subdivision (e) of Section 30610, but not under subdivision (a) of this section may be revoked at any time by the commission, if the conditions of exclusion are violated. Tide and submerged land, beaches, and lots immediately adjacent to the inland extent of any beach, or of the mean high tide line of the sea where there is no beach, and all lands and waters subject to the public trust shall not be excluded under either subdivision (a) of this section or subdivision (e) of Section 30610.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1087, Sec. 8.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.6.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is in the public interest to provide by statute for the resolution of the lengthy and bitter dispute involving development of existing legal lots within the unincorporated area of Sonoma County, commonly known as the Sea Ranch. The reasons for the need to finally resolve this dispute include the following:

(1) Acknowledgment by the responsible regulatory agencies that development of existing lots at Sea Ranch can proceed consistent with the provisions of this division and other applicable laws provided certain conditions have been met. Development has been prevented at considerable costs to property owners because these conditions have not been met.

(2) That it has been, and continues to be, costly to Sea Ranch property owners and the public because of, among other reasons, extensive and protracted litigation, continuing administrative proceedings, and escalating construction costs.

(3) The need to provide additional public access to and along portions of the coast at the Sea Ranch in order to meet the requirements of this division. The continuation of this dispute prevents the public from enjoying the use of those access opportunities.

(4) The commission is unable to refund 118 “environmental deposits” to property owners because coastal development permit conditions have not been met.

(5) It appears likely that this lengthy dispute will continue unless the Legislature provides a solution, and the
 failure to resolve the dispute will be unfair to property owners and the public.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that because of the unique circumstances of this situation, the provisions of this section constitute the most expeditious and equitable mechanism to ensure a timely solution that is in the best interest of property owners and that is consistent with this division.

(c) If the Sea Ranch Association and Oceanic California, Inc. desire to take advantage of the terms of this section, they shall, not sooner than April 1, 1981, and not later than July 1, 1981, deposit into escrow deeds and other necessary documents that have been determined by the State Coastal Conservancy before
 their deposit in escrow to be legally sufficient to convey to the State Coastal Conservancy enforceable and nonexclusive public use easements free and clear of liens and encumbrances for the easements specifically described in this subdivision. Upon deposit of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) into the same escrow account by the State Coastal Conservancy, but in no event later than 30 days after the deeds and other necessary documents have been deposited in the escrow account, the escrow agent shall transmit the five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), less the escrow, title, and administrative costs of the State Coastal Conservancy, in an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), to the Sea Ranch Association and shall convey the deeds and other necessary documents to the State Coastal Conservancy. The conservancy shall subsequently convey the deeds and other necessary documents to an appropriate public agency that is authorized and agrees to accept the easements. The
 deeds specified in this subdivision shall be for the following easements:

(1) In Unit 34A, a 30-foot wide vehicle and pedestrian access easement from a point on State Highway 1, 50 feet north of mile post marker 56.75, a day parking area for 10 vehicles, a 15-foot wide pedestrian accessway from the parking area continuing west to the bluff-top trail, and a 15-foot wide bluff-top pedestrian easement beginning at the southern boundary of Gualala Point County Park and continuing for approximately three miles in a southerly direction to the sandy beach at the northern end of Unit 28 just north of Walk-on Beach together with a 15-foot wide pedestrian easement to provide a connection to Walk-on Beach to the south.

(2) In Unit 24, a day parking area west of State Highway 1, just south of Whalebone Reach, for six vehicles, and a 15-foot wide pedestrian accessway over Sea Ranch Association
 common areas crossing Pacific Reach and continuing westerly to the southern portion of Shell Beach with a 15-foot wide pedestrian easement to connect with the northern portion of Shell Beach.

(3) In Unit 36, a 30-foot wide vehicle and pedestrian accessway from State Highway 1, mile post marker 53.96, a day parking area for 10 vehicles, and a 15-foot wide pedestrian accessway from the parking area to the beach at the intersection of Units 21 and 36.

(4) In Unit 17, adjacent to the intersection of Navigator’s Reach and State Highway 1, 75 feet north of mile post marker 52.21, enough land to provide day parking for four vehicles and a 15-foot wide pedestrian accessway from the parking area to Pebble Beach.

(5) In Unit 8, a 30-foot wide vehicle and pedestrian accessway from State Highway 1, mile post marker 50.85, a day
 parking area for 10 vehicles and a 15-foot wide pedestrian accessway from the parking area to Black Point Beach.

(6) With respect to each of the beaches to which access will be provided by the easements specified in this subdivision, an easement for public use of the area between the line of mean high tide and either the toe of the adjacent bluff or the first line of vegetation, whichever is nearer to the water.

(7) Scenic view easements for those areas specified by the executive director, as provided in subdivision (d), and which easements allow for the removal of trees in order to restore and preserve scenic views from State Highway 1.

(d) The executive director of the commission shall, within 30 days after the effective date of this section, specifically identify the areas along State Highway 1 for which the
 scenic view easements provided for in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) will be required. In identifying the areas for which easements for the restoration and preservation of public scenic views will be required, the executive director shall take into account the effect of tree removal so as to avoid causing erosion problems. It is the intent of the Legislature that only those areas be identified where scenic views to or along the coast are unique or particularly beautiful or spectacular and which thereby take on public importance. The restoration and preservation of the scenic view areas specified pursuant to this subdivision shall be at public expense.

(e) Within 30 days after the effective date of this section, the executive director of the commission shall specify design criteria for the height, site, and bulk of any development visible from the scenic view areas provided for in subdivision (d). This criteria shall be enforced by the County
 of Sonoma if the deeds and other necessary documents specified in subdivision (c) have been conveyed to the State Coastal Conservancy. This criteria shall be reasonable so as to enable affected property owners to build single-family residences of substantially similar overall size to those that property owners who are not affected by these criteria may build or have already built under the Sea Ranch Association’s building design criteria. The purpose of the criteria is to ensure that development will not substantially detract from the specified scenic view areas.

(f) On and after the date on which the deeds and other necessary documents deposited in escrow pursuant to subdivision (c) have been conveyed to the State Coastal Conservancy, no additional public access requirements shall be imposed at the Sea Ranch pursuant to this division by any regional commission, the commission, any other state agency, or any local government. The Legislature
 hereby finds and declares that the provision of the access facilities specified in this subdivision shall be deemed adequate to meet the requirements of this division.

(g) The realignment of internal roads within the Sea Ranch shall not be required by any state or local agency acting pursuant to this division. However, appropriate easements may be required by the County of Sonoma to provide for the expansion of State Highway 1 for the development of turnout and left-turn lanes and for the location of a bicycle path, when the funds are made available for those purposes. The Legislature finds and declares that this subdivision is adequate to meet the requirements of this division to ensure that new development at the Sea Ranch will not overburden the capacity of State Highway 1 to the detriment of recreational users.

(h) No coastal development permit shall be required pursuant to
 this division for the development of supplemental water supply facilities determined by the State Water Resources Control Board to be necessary to meet the needs of legally permitted development within the Sea Ranch. The commission, through its executive director, shall participate in the proceedings before the State Water Resources Control Board relating to these facilities and may recommend terms and conditions that the commission deems necessary to protect against adverse impacts on coastal zone resources. The State Water Resources Control Board shall condition any permit or other authorization for the development of these facilities so as to carry out the commission’s recommendation, unless the State Water Resources Control Board determines that the recommended terms or conditions are unreasonable. This subdivision shall become operative if the deeds and other necessary documents specified in subdivision (c) have been conveyed to the State Coastal Conservancy.

(i) Within 90 days after the effective date of this section, the commission, through its executive director, shall specify criteria for septic tank construction, operation, and monitoring within the Sea Ranch to ensure protection of coastal zone resources consistent with the policies of this division. The North Coast Regional Water Quality Control Board shall review the criteria and adopt it, unless it finds the criteria or a portion thereof is unreasonable. The regional board shall be responsible for the enforcement of the adopted criteria if the deeds and other necessary documents specified in subdivision (c) have been conveyed to the State Coastal Conservancy.

(j) Within 60 days after the date on which the deeds and other necessary documents deposited in escrow pursuant to subdivision (c) have been conveyed to the State Coastal Conservancy, the commission shall refund every Sea Ranch
 “environmental deposit” together with any interest earned on the deposit to the person, or
 the person’s designee, who paid the deposit.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after the date on which the deeds and other necessary documents deposited in escrow pursuant to subdivision (c) have been conveyed to the State Coastal Conservancy, a coastal development permit shall not be required pursuant to this division for the construction of any single-family residence dwelling on any vacant, legal lot existing at the Sea Ranch on the effective date of this section. With respect to any other development for which a coastal development permit is required within legally existing lots at the Sea Ranch, no conditions may be imposed pursuant to this division that impose additional public access requirements or that relate to supplemental water supply facilities, septic tank systems, or internal road realignment.

(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if on July 1, 1981, deeds and other necessary documents that are legally sufficient to convey the easements specified in subdivision (c) have not been deposited in an escrow account, the provisions of this section shall no longer be operative and shall have no force or effect and thereafter all the provisions of this division in effect before enactment of this section shall again be applicable to any development within the Sea Ranch.

(m) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the provisions for the settlement of this dispute, especially with respect to public access, as set forth in this section provide an alternative to and are equivalent to the provisions set forth in Section
 30610.3. The Legislature further finds that the provisions of this section are not in lieu of the permit and planning requirements of this division but rather provide for an alternative mechanism to Section 30610.3 for the resolution of outstanding issues at the Sea Ranch.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 20.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.8.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that a dispute exists at the Hollister Ranch in the County of Santa Barbara with respect to the implementation of public access policies of this division and that it is in the interest of the state and the property owners at the Hollister Ranch to resolve this dispute in an expeditious manner. The Legislature further finds and declares that public access should be provided in a timely manner and that in order to achieve this goal, while permitting property owners to commence construction, the provisions of this section are necessary to promote the public’s welfare.

(b) For purposes of Section 30610.3 and with respect to the Hollister Ranch public access program, the in-lieu fee
 shall be thirty-three thousand dollars ($33,000) for each permit, adjusted annually for inflation pursuant to the consumer price index. Upon payment by the applicant for a coastal development permit of this in-lieu fee to the State Coastal Conservancy for use in implementing the public access program, the applicant may immediately commence construction if the other conditions of the coastal development permit, if any, have been met. No condition may be added to a coastal development permit that was issued before the effective date of this section for any development at the Hollister Ranch.

(c) The State Coastal Conservancy and the State Lands Commission shall use their full authority provided under law to implement, as expeditiously as possible, the public access policies and provisions of this division at the Hollister Ranch in the County of Santa Barbara.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 692, Sec. 2.   (AB 1680)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.81.

(a) (1) To ensure public access to Hollister Ranch in the County of Santa Barbara, the commission shall, in collaboration with the State Coastal Conservancy, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and the State Lands Commission, by April 1, 2021, develop a contemporary public access program for Hollister Ranch that will replace the existing coastal access program for Hollister Ranch that the commission adopted in 1982.

(2) The public access program for Hollister Ranch shall be informed by a public outreach and stakeholder engagement process and shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) A list of public access options to the state-owned
 tidelands at Hollister Ranch. Each option shall, at a minimum, include options for public access by land and shall include a description of the scope of access as well as an assessment of implementation costs and ongoing operation.

(B) A description of the physical environment at Hollister Ranch, including the shoreline, beach areas, coastal and marine habitat, existing land uses, and cultural and historical resources.

(C) A description of the current level of public access to the state-owned tidelands at Hollister Ranch.

(D) Educational and scientific research opportunities along the Hollister Ranch coast associated with the natural, cultural, and historical resources.

(E) Provisions to protect and preserve sensitive natural, cultural, and historical
 resources.

(3) In addition to the components required by paragraph (2), the public access program shall include all of the following:

(A) A summary of permits needed to implement the program.

(B) An implementation strategy.

(C) A program that implements specified portions of the program providing land access that includes a first phase of public access to the beach by land controlled by the Hollister Ranch Owners Association. On or before April 1, 2022, the State Coastal Conservancy shall fully implement the first phase of the public access to the beach. Implementation of this subparagraph is subject to appropriation of funding to provide for the specified land access.

(4) An action by a
 private person or entity to impede, delay, or otherwise obstruct the implementation of the public access pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) or other provisions of the public access program constitutes a violation of the public access provisions of this division.

(b) The commission, the State Coastal Conservancy, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and the State Lands Commission, or their designated representatives, shall have access to the common areas within Hollister Ranch in order to evaluate resources and determine appropriate public access opportunities and to fulfill implementation of the public access program identified in this section.

(c) If a public access program deadline required under subdivision (a) is not met for any reason, the commission, in collaboration with the State Coastal Conservancy, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and the State Lands
 Commission, shall submit a report to the Legislature within 30 days of missing the deadline. The report shall include an explanation for why the public access program has been delayed, a proposed completion date, and any other relevant information pertinent to the completion of the full implementation of the public access program for Hollister Ranch. A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) Notwithstanding provision 2 of category (2) of Item 3760-490-721 of the Budget Act of 1984, all in-lieu fees received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30610.8 before, on, or after January 1, 2020, as well as other moneys received by the State Coastal Conservancy for providing public access at Hollister Ranch from other public or private sources, including nonprofit sources, shall be deposited in the Hollister Ranch Access Management Subaccount, which is hereby
 created in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund. Moneys in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used for any action necessary to implement the public access program for Hollister Ranch.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 692, Sec. 3.   (AB 1680)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.9.

(a) This section applies only if the governing body of a local government elects to designate the commission as the processing and permitting authority for purposes of this section.

(b) In order to expedite the processing of an application for a coastal development permit for a motion picture, television, or commercial production project in the coastal zone, the governing body of a local government with a certified local coastal program may elect to designate the commission as the appropriate authority to process and issue a coastal development permit for a temporary, nonrecurring location set, if the production activity, including preparation, construction, filming, and set removal at the site will not exceed 190 days, in accordance with the following procedures:

(1) The applicant shall submit a copy of the commission’s coastal development permit application, or the local coastal development permit application, to the local government. The governing body of the local government may elect to designate the commission as the processing and permitting authority on a project-by-project basis. The governing body may designate the local coastal administrator or other designee as the decisionmaking authority to decide the projects that will be transmitted to the commission for processing and permitting.

(2) If the governing body of the local government elects to designate the commission as the processing and permitting authority for a project, all documents and changes submitted to the commission during the course of the application process shall also be submitted to the local government for informational purposes. The local government may transmit any recommendations it may have for the project to the commission.
